West Virginia, session 2025, HB2498.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2J. infrastructure improvement fund. §24-2J-1. Infrastructure Improvement Fund; rate increases; requirements; limitations. (a) As a condition of all future utility rate increases, if an increase is granted to a private or public utility system by the West Virginia Public Service Commission, 5% of all individually billed new percentage increase charges on all existing or future customer accounts must be set aside by the utility into an "infrastructure improvement" fund;(1) This fund cannot be used for routine maintenance;(2) This fund must be used for physical utility infrastructure (i.e., water lines, electrical transmission lines, treatments facilities, power generation substations, power plants themselves, etc.).(b) This cost cannot be passed on to the consumer through any category of fees or through future rate increases.(c) This fund can only be utilized for new utility infrastructure improvement projects.